Washington statutes.
RCW 43.42.100

Streamlined process certification.

Within available funds, the office of regulatory assistance may certify permit processes at the local level as streamlined processes. In developing the certification program, the director must work with local jurisdictions to establish the criteria and the process for certification. Jurisdictions with permit processes certified as streamlined may receive priority in receipt of state funds for infrastructure projects.

[ 2012 c 196 s 8.]